Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska88-538
Duplicate receipt; issuance; effect.

A duplicate receipt shall not be issued by any warehouse licensee without prior approval by the commission. A receipt so issued, upon the face of which the word duplicate is plainly placed, shall be a representation and warranty by the warehouse licensee that such receipt is an accurate copy of an original receipt properly issued and uncanceled at the date of the issuance of the duplicate.

Laws 1987, LB 164, § 14.